Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8000 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Bureau” means the Legislative Service Bureau as established
in Section 450.1 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1625 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “Department” means the Oklahoma Insurance Department as
established in Section 301 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. “Health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. “Mandate” means any requirement proposed in legislation or
regulation that obligates health benefit plans to:
a. provide, offer, or expand coverage for specific health
care services or providers, treatments, medical
supplies, or populations, or
b. implement operational or administrative processes such
as prior authorization, reporting requirements, or
claims procedures.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8001 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. When the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives or
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate or their
delegates decides a bill contains a mandate impacting health benefit
plans as provided for in Section 1 of this act, they may direct the
Legislative Service Bureau to submit such bill to the Oklahoma
Insurance Department for the purpose of conducting an impact
analysis.
B. 1. When conducting such analysis, the Department shall
analyze the proposed mandate and prepare a written report to be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1625 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

retu rned to the Legislative Service Bureau within sixty (60) days
from referral.
2. Such report shall include, but not be limited to:
a. social impact:
(1) the extent to which the mandate addresses a
significant public health issue,
(2) the number of individuals and demographics
affected by the proposed mandate, and
(3) any anticipated impact on access to health care
services,
b. medical efficacy:
(1) a review of peer-reviewed studies, clinical
guidelines, and other scientific evidence
evaluating the effectiveness of the treatment or
service, and
(2) input from medical experts and professional
organizations as appropriate,
c. financial impact:
(1) the estimated effect on insurance premiums for
consumers and employers,
(2) the potential cost implications for insurers,
health care providers, and state-funded programs
that provide payment for covered services, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1625 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(3) any anticipated impact on the stability of the
state’s insurance market.
C. The Department may contract with a third-party vendor who
specializes in actuarial services, insurance mandate reviews, or
other services which the Department deems necessary to carry out the
provisions of this act.
D. The Department may seek the input and expertise of any
agency of this state to evaluate the potential impact to state-
funded programs that provide payment for covered services.
E. Upon return of the analysis by the Department to the Bureau,
the Bureau shall provide a copy, by either written or electronic
means, to the author of the legislative measure, the chairman of the
legislative committee to which the measure was referred, and make
such report available on the legislative website, which is
accessible to the general public.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 5, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1625 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)